Massachusetts, session 194th, H2076.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 14D of chapter 252 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following:- Such authority shall be
subject to the provisions of chapter 150E. For purposes of chapter 150E the employer shall be
the state reclamation and mosquito control board.
of 1